North Dakota, session 69, SB2190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 50-24.1-45 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
50-24.1-45. Medical assistance benefits - Family adaptive behavior treatment and
guidance - Dental screening and assessments - Dental case management -
Teledentistry - Applied behavioral analysis .
Medical assistance coverage must include payment for the following services:
1. Family adaptive behavioral treatment and guidance to educate parents and caregivers
to continue to carry out plans and recommendations of applied behavioral analysis.
2. Dental screening and assessment of patients to identify individuals in need of
additional assessment, diagnostic, and treatment services.
3. Dental case management for maintenance of oral health for special populations,
including elderly, special needs, medically fragile, and children.
4. Asynchronous teledentistry to reduce barriers to dental care through outreach
programs and to integrate oral health into general health care settings to identify and
refer treatment needs.
5. Applied behavioral analysis to provide coverage to both assess and treat common
behavioral problems across the lifespan of individuals with autism spectrum disorder .
6. The services identified in subsections 2, 3, and 4 , and 5 do not apply to Medicaid
expansion.
Page No. 1 25.0084.03000